Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.120

Construction of chapter.

This chapter is declared to be remedial; its purpose is to settle and to afford relief from uncertainty and insecurity with respect to rights, status and other legal relations; and is to be liberally construed and administered.

[ 1935 c 113 s 12; RRS s 784-12.]